Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2703.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "pedalcycle with electric assist" in section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Pedalcycle with electric assist." [A vehicle weighing not more than 100 pounds with two or three wheels more than 11 1234567891011121314151617181920 inches in diameter, manufactured or assembled with an electric motor system rated at not more than 750 watts and equipped with operable pedals and capable of a speed not more than 20 miles per hour on a level surface when powered by the motor source only. The term does not include a device specifically designed for use by persons with disabilities.] As follows:(1) A vehicle that: (i) weighs not more than 100 pounds; (ii) has two or three wheels more than 11 inches in diameter;(iii) is manufactured or assembled with an electric motor system rated at not more than 750 watts;(iv) is equipped with operable pedals and a seat or saddle for the rider; and(v) satisfies one of the following:(A) provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the vehicle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour; (B) may be used exclusively to propel the pedalcycle with electric assist and is not capable of providing assistance when the vehicle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour; or (C) provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the vehicle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour. (2) The term does not include a device specifically designed for use by persons with disabilities.* * *Section 2. Section 3502 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3502. Penalty for violation of subchapter.20260HB2703PN3779 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [Any] (a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), any person violating any provision of this subchapter is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $10.(b) Pedalcycles with electric assist.--(1) Any person violating any provision of this subchapter while operating a pedalcycle with electric assist is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $50.(2) Any person who operates a pedalcycle with electric assist in careless disregard for the safety of another person and unintentionally causes bodily injury of another person is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $100 but not more than $250.Section 3. Section 6109(a)(8) of Title 75 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6109. Specific powers of department and local authorities.(a) Enumeration of police powers.--The provisions of this title shall not be deemed to prevent the department on State-designated highways and local authorities on streets or highways within their physical boundaries from the reasonable exercise of their police powers. The following are presumed to be reasonable exercises of police power:* * *(8) (i) Regulating the operation of pedalcycles and requiring their registration and inspection, and the payment of a reasonable registration fee[.], and establishing fines for the operation of pedalcycles that are both not registered with the department and equipped 20260HB2703PN3779 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with an electric motor system that does not satisfy the specifications in the definition of "pedalcycle with electric assist" under section 102 (relating to definitions).(ii) This paragraph does not include pedalcycles with electric assist.(8.1) (i) Regulating the operation of pedalcycles with electric assist, including:(A) Limiting or prohibiting their use on any highway, including the right-of-way, or sidewalks.(B) Establishing fines for violations of ordinances established under this paragraph.(ii) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize the department or a local authority to require the registration or insuring of a pedalcycle with electric assist or require a license to operate a pedalcycle with electric assist.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2703PN3779 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819